Washington statutes.
RCW 10.98.040

Definitions.

Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter.

(1) "Arrest and fingerprint form" means the reporting form prescribed by the *identification, child abuse, and criminal history section to initiate compiling arrest and identification information.

(2) "Chief law enforcement officer" includes the sheriff or director of public safety of a county, the chief of police of a city or town, and chief officers of other law enforcement agencies operating within the state.

(3) "Department" means the department of corrections.

(4) "Disposition" means the conclusion of a criminal proceeding at any stage it occurs in the criminal justice system. Disposition includes but is not limited to temporary or permanent outcomes such as charges dropped by police, charges not filed by the prosecuting attorney, deferred prosecution, defendant absconded, charges filed by the prosecuting attorney pending court findings such as not guilty, dismissed, guilty, or guilty—case appealed to higher court.

(5) "Disposition report" means the reporting form prescribed by the *identification, child abuse, and criminal history section to report the legal procedures taken after completing an arrest and fingerprint form. The disposition report shall include but not be limited to the following types of information:

(a) The type of disposition;

(b) The statutory citation for the arrests;

(c) The sentence structure if the defendant was convicted of a felony;

(d) The state identification number; and

(e) Identification information and other information that is prescribed by the *identification, child abuse, and criminal history section.

(6) "Fingerprints" means the fingerprints taken from arrested or charged persons under the procedures prescribed by the Washington state patrol *identification, child abuse, and criminal history section.

(7) "Prosecuting attorney" means the public or private attorney prosecuting a criminal case.

(8) "Section" refers to the Washington state patrol *section on identification, child abuse, and criminal history.

(9) "Sentence structure" means itemizing the components of the felony sentence. The sentence structure shall include but not be limited to the total or partial confinement sentenced, and whether the sentence is prison or jail, community supervision, fines, restitution, or community restitution.

[ 2002 c 175 s 18; 1999 c 143 s 51; 1985 c 201 s 1; 1984 c 17 s 4.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: The "identification, child abuse, and criminal history section" was renamed the "identification and criminal history section" by 2006 c 294 s 1.

Effective date—2002 c 175: See note following RCW 7.80.130.